Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.160

Order of support for dependent child.

(1) In an action brought under this chapter, the court may inquire into the ability of the parent or parents of the child to pay child support and may enter an order of child support as set forth in chapter 26.19 RCW. The court may enforce the same by execution, or in any way in which a court of equity may enforce its decrees. All child support orders entered pursuant to this chapter shall be in compliance with the provisions of RCW 26.23.050.

(2) For purposes of this section, if a dependent child's parent is an unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor applicant, then the parent or parents of the minor shall also be deemed a parent or parents of the dependent child. However, liability for child support under this subsection only exists if the parent or parents of the unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor applicant are provided the opportunity for a hearing on their ability to provide support. Any child support order requiring such a parent or parents to provide support for the minor parent's child may be effective only until the minor parent reaches eighteen years of age.

(3) In the absence of a court order setting support, the department may establish an administrative order for support upon receipt of a referral or application for support enforcement services.

[ 2004 c 183 s 1; 1997 c 58 s 505; 1993 c 358 s 2; 1987 c 435 s 14; 1981 c 195 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 44; 1969 ex.s. c 138 s 1; 1961 c 302 s 7; 1913 c 160 s 8; RRS s 1987-8. Formerly RCW 13.04.100.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 183: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 183 s 6.]

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective date—1987 c 435: See RCW 26.23.900.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.

Good cause exceptions to the establishment and enforcement of child support from parents of children in out-of-home placement: RCW 13.32A.178.